Utah statutes.
39-6-9.   Confinement.
(1)  "Confinement" means the physical restraint of a person.
(2) (a)  A person subject to this chapter, who is charged with an offense
under this chapter, may be ordered into arrest or confinement, as
circumstances require.
(b)  When a person subject to this chapter is placed into arrest or
confinement prior to trial, action shall be taken immediately to notify him of
the specific offense charged against him, and to either try the person, or
dismiss charges against him and release him.
(3)  Confinement before, during, or after trial by a military court shall be
in either a guard house or a civilian jail, or other penal facility determined
by the governor or his designee.
